Maryland, session 2025, SB0237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–906.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible dependent” means:
(i) a child who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(e); or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0237*

SENATE BILL 237
(ii) a parent who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(i).
(3) “Eligible spouse” means a spouse who meets the requirements stated in
38 C.F.R. § 38.620(e).
(4) “State veterans’ cemetery” means a cemetery that the Department
establishes under this section.
(5) In this section and in § 9–907 of this subtitle, “veteran” means an
individual who:
(i) served other than dishonorably on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States; [or]
(ii) served other than dishonorably as a FULL–TIME member of the
[State militia ordered into active service of the United States by order of the President and
was killed in the line of duty] COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE U.S. PUBLIC HEALTH
SERVICE OR THE COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE NATIONAL OCEANIC AND
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION; OR
(III) SERVED OTHER THAN DISHONORABLY AND COMPLETED
THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATION OF SERVICE AS A MEMBER OF THE
NATIONAL GUARD OR THE MILITARY RESERVES.
(6) “Washington Cemetery” means the Civil War cemetery grounds
authorized by Chapter 213 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1870.
(f) To qualify for a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery:
(1) the applicant must be a veteran who meets the requirements for burial
at a national veterans’ cemetery or an eligible spouse or dependent of a veteran who meets
the requirements of this subsection; and
(2) if a veteran[, the veteran] IS A MEMBER OF THE NATIONAL GUARD
OR THE MILITARY RESERVES, THE MEMBER must also have been a resident of the State:
(i) when the [veteran] MEMBER entered the armed forces;
(ii) when the [veteran] MEMBER died; or
(iii) for 2 years, unless, for a reason that the Department finds
compelling, the Department waives the time period.

SENATE BILL 237 3
(i) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Department [shall bury the] MAY NOT CHARGE A veteran or eligible
spouse or dependent [without charge] FOR BURIAL.
(2) IF THE INDIVIDUAL BEING BURIED IS A MEMBER OF THE
NATIONAL GUARD OR THE MILITARY RESERVES OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S ELIGIBLE
DEPENDENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT AT THE TIME OF BURIAL A FEE
EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL PLOT ALLOWANCE ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL
CEMETERY ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.